Utah statutes.
32A-15a-201.   Commission to prohibit nuisance activities by licensees --
License not renewed.
(1)  In accordance with Section 32A-1-103, the commission shall require a
retail licensee as a condition of being licensed under this title to operate
in a manner so as not to endanger the public health, peace, safety, welfare,
or morals of the community.
(2) (a)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures
Act, and Sections 32A-15a-202 and 32A-15a-203, the commission may deny the
renewal of any retail license issued under this title if:
(i)  a formal objection to the renewal is filed; and
(ii)  the commission determines that the retail licensee has engaged in
nuisance activities to such an extent that the nuisance activities have
adversely impacted the public health, peace, safety, welfare, or morals of the
neighboring community of the licensed premises.
(b)  In making a determination under this Subsection (2), the commission may
consider:
(i)  the types of nuisance activities in which a licensee has engaged;
(ii)  the frequency or pattern of the nuisance activities; and
(iii)  the retail licensee's notice of and failure to abate or correct the
nuisance activities.
